Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-3528
Practice through organization; certificate of authorization; registration of name; requirements.

(1) The practice or offer to practice for others of geology by individuals licensed under the Geologists Regulation Act through an organization is permitted if the criteria for organizational practice established by the board are met and the organization has been issued a certificate of authorization by the board. All technical submissions by an organization involving the practice of geology when issued or filed for public record shall be dated and bear the seal of the professional geologist who prepared the submission or under whose immediate direction it was prepared.

(2) An organization desiring a certificate of authorization shall file with the board an application, using the form provided by the board, which also contains a list of the names and addresses of all officers of the organization, duly licensed to practice geology in the state through the organization. Any change in the list of officers during the certificate period shall be designated on the same form and filed with the board within thirty days after the effective date of the change. If the requirements of this section are met, the board shall issue a certificate of authorization to the organization and the organization may contract for and collect fees for furnishing professional services.

(3) The Geologists Regulation Act shall not prevent an organization from performing professional services for itself.

(4) An organization is not relieved of its responsibility for the conduct or acts of its agents, employees, officers, or partners by reason of its compliance with this section. An individual practicing geology is not relieved of responsibility for services performed by reason of employment or any other relationship with an organization holding a certificate of authorization.

(5) The Secretary of State shall not issue a certificate of authority to do business in this state or accept a registration of name from an organization that intends to practice geology, unless the board has issued such organization a certificate of authorization or a letter indicating the eligibility of such organization to receive a certificate of authorization from the board or to register such name. The organization shall supply the certificate or letter with its application for incorporation or licensure.

(6) The Secretary of State shall not register any trade name or service mark that includes the word geology, or any modification or derivative of such word, in the trade name or service mark of an organization unless the board has issued such organization a certificate of authorization or a letter indicating the eligibility of such organization to receive a certificate of authorization or to register such trade name or service mark.

(7) The certificate of authorization shall be renewed periodically as required by the board.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 76;

Laws 2013, LB91, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB38, § 23.